Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Early Learning Division shall conduct a study on:
(a) The use of suspension and expulsion in early childhood care and  education programs;
and
(b) Efforts to reduce and  prevent the use of suspension and expulsion in early childhood
care and education programs.
(2) The division shall  report the results of the study required under this section to the
appropriate interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly no later than September 15,
2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. An early childhood care or education program may not suspend or expel  any
child if the program receives state public funds  from the Early Learning Division or the
program is certified under ORS 329A.280 or registered under ORS 329A.330.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 3 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, the
Early Learning Council and the Early Learning Division  may take any action before the op-
erative date set forth  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the council
and division to exercise, on and  after the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the  council and division by
section 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. No later than July 1, 2022, the Early Learning Division must submit to  the
appropriate interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly a report on the proposed im-
plementation of section  3 of this 2021 Act. The report must include a description of the
processes for  conducting investigations and contested case hearings under ORS chapter 183
for any violations of section 3 of this 2021 Act and must  make any related recommendations
for legislation.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 236 (SB 236-B) Page 1
Passed by Senate May 4, 2021
Repassed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 236 (SB 236-B) Page 2